Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1082.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Mobile unit" means a self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed mobile unit that meets all of the following 12345678910111213141516171819202122 requirements:(1) Is at least twenty-four feet in length.(2) Is licensed by the board as an establishment for the practice of cosmetology under this act.(3) Complies with all health and safety regulations established by the board.* * *"Salon" means a place, including a mobile unit, where the practice of cosmetology is performed by a cosmetologist licensed under this act.* * *Section 2. Section 16(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 16. Fees.--* * *(b) In case a salon owner changes the location of his or her salon, other than a mobile unit, a new license must be secured. The board shall, by regulation, fix the fee required for such new license.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1082PN1200 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819